Utah statutes.
11-17-4.   Bonds -- Limitations -- Form and provisions -- Sale --
Negotiability.
(1)  All bonds issued by a municipality or county under this chapter shall be
limited obligations of the municipality or county. Bonds and interest coupons
issued under this chapter shall not constitute nor give rise to a general
obligation or liability of the municipality or county or a charge against its
general credit or taxing powers.  Such limitation shall be plainly stated upon
the face of such bonds.
(2)  The bonds referred to in Subsection (1) may be authorized by resolution
of the governing body, and may:
(a)  be executed and delivered at any time and from time to time;
(b)  be in such form and denominations;
(c)  be of such tenor;
(d)  be in registered or bearer form either as to principal or interest or
both;
(e)  be payable in such installments and at such time or times as the
governing body may deem advisable;
(f)  be payable at such place or places either within or without the state of
Utah;
(g)  bear interest at such rate or rates, payable at such place or places, and
evidenced in such manner;
(h)  be redeemable prior to maturity, with or without premium;
(i)  be convertible into equity positions in any asset or assets acquired or
developed with the proceeds of the sale of the bonds; and
(j)  contain such other provisions not inconsistent with this chapter as shall
be deemed for the best interests of the municipality or county and provided
for in the proceedings of the governing body under which the bonds shall be
authorized to be issued.
(3)  Any bonds issued under this chapter may be sold at public or private sale
in such manner and at such time or times as may be determined by the governing
body to be most advantageous.  The municipality or county may pay all
expenses, premiums, and commissions which the governing body may deem
necessary or advantageous in connection with the authorization, sale, and
issuance of such bonds from the proceeds of the sale of such bonds or from the
revenues of the project or projects.
(4)  All bonds issued under this chapter and all interest coupons applicable
thereto shall be construed to be negotiable instruments, despite the fact that
they are payable solely from a specified source.
